California statutes. Food and Agricultural Code
  ARTICLE 8. Shipping Permits [21261. - 21261.]

21261.

The chief may provide for the issuance of shipping permits for inspected cattle which are shipped by railroad, or for cattle that are covered by one certificate of inspection, which are transported in more than one conveyance.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Fees [21281. - 21292.]

21281.

All brand inspection fees are due and payable at the time of the inspection. The amount which is due for all inspections that are made shall be paid to the director within 30 days after the issuance of the brand inspection certificates by the inspector for the cattle which were inspected, unless there is on deposit with the bureau a bond in an amount and form which is approved by the chief or a cash deposit to cover the payment of the fees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 635, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

21281.5.

In addition to other applicable fees, as provided by this chapter, the secretary may impose a service charge in an amount not to exceed twenty-five dollars ($25) for an inspection of 29 head of cattle or less at each site, or a service charge of fifteen dollars ($15) for an inspection of 30 head of cattle or more at each site.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 126.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

21282.

Any fees which are due and payable for brand inspections which are not paid as required by this article may be recovered by the director pursuant to Section 281. Inspection services may be refused for nonpayment of prior services which have been rendered.

When the brand inspection fees due are not paid in accordance with Section 21281, a penalty assessment shall be added to such fees and collected as follows: 

(a) When the brand inspection fees due are greater than twenty-five dollars ($25), then 20 percent of such fees shall be added to the inspection fees.

(b) When the brand inspection fees due are twenty-five dollars ($25) or less, five dollars ($5) shall be added to the inspection fees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 938.)
-------------------------------------------

21283.

(a) Unless otherwise provided in this article, inspection fees shall be paid at the point of inspection.

(b) The fee for inspection is one dollar and sixty cents ($1.60) for each animal that is inspected, except as follows:

(1) The fee for inspection at a registered feedlot, as defined in Section 20015, is eight-five cents ($0.85) for each animal that is inspected.

(2) The fee for inspecting an animal that originated in another state and was shipped into this state for feeding direct to a registered feedlot is sixty cents ($0.60) for each animal that is inspected.

(3) The
 fee for inspecting an animal that was inspected at a posted stockyard, or posted saleyard, in this state, and shipped direct to a registered feedlot, is sixty cents ($0.60) for each animal that is inspected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 214, Sec. 1.   (AB 2436)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21283.5.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, on all private treaty transaction inspections, as defined in Section 20026, regardless of destination, the fee of one dollar and sixty cents ($1.60) shall be paid at the point of inspection for each animal that is inspected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 214, Sec. 2.   (AB 2436)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21284.

A charge shall not be made for the inspection of suckling calves which are accompanying their mothers if they are transported for purposes other than for sale or slaughter and without a change in ownership.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

21285.

The fee is one dollar and sixty cents ($1.60) for the inspection before sale of each animal at a public saleyard that is posted by the Secretary of Agriculture of the United States or at a public saleyard if the animal originated in another state and it was shipped to this state, consigned to that public stockyard or public saleyard.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 214, Sec. 3.   (AB 2436)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21288.

In a modified point-of-origin inspection area, as provided in Section 21111, the fee for the inspection of cattle, other than suckling calves that are accompanying their mothers, is one dollar and sixty cents ($1.60) per head if the cattle are transported out of the area for purposes other than sale or slaughter and no change of ownership is involved.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 214, Sec. 4.   (AB 2436)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21288.5.

For cattle, other than suckling calves accompanying their mothers, transported out of the state for purposes other than sale or slaughter and where no change of ownership is involved, the inspection fee is one dollar and sixty cents ($1.60) per head.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 214, Sec. 5.   (AB 2436)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21289.

The fee for the inspection of cattle which originated in any county or geographical area where a full point-of-origin inspection is maintained pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 21141) shall be established by the director, upon recommendation of the Livestock Identification Advisory Board, in an amount sufficient to cover the actual costs incurred by the bureau in performing the inspection. A fee shall not be charged for any suckling calves which are accompanying their mothers if they are not shipped for sale or slaughter and no change of ownership is involved. Cattle moving out of a full point-of-origin area to a destination inspection point are exempt from the destination inspection fee. However, these cattle are subject to further inspection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 361, Sec. 13.   Effective August 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

21290.5.

Any person who receives cattle from any cattle sale market, either public or private, including any public stockyard where sales of cattle are held, may, upon request and upon payment of a fee of eighty cents ($0.80) per head before accepting delivery of any cattle from that market or stockyard, have a reinspection of the cattle.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 214, Sec. 6.   (AB 2436)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21291.

The fees which are provided in Article 9 (commencing with Section 21281) and Article 5 (commencing with Section 21561) may be:

(a) Lowered by the director, based upon a finding and recommendation of the Livestock Identification Advisory Board, whenever they determine that the cost of administering and enforcing the provisions of this division may be maintained with a lower fee.

(b) Increased, by an amount not to exceed 20 percent of the statutory fee, by the director upon the recommendation of the Livestock Identification Advisory Board whenever they determine that the costs of administering and enforcing the provisions of this division require a greater fee. The advisory board must approve any increase in fees by a two-thirds vote of its entire membership.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 404, Sec. 6.)
-------------------------------------------

21292.

(a) The Bureau of Livestock Identification is authorized to enter into a Memorandum of Understanding with any purebred cattle producer or breeder for purposes of pre-inspection of purebred bulls, or 4H or Future Farmers of America project calves, that are for sale within the state.

(b) The Memorandum of Understanding shall contain, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) All bulls and project calves for sale must be identified.

(2) All bulls and project calves must be placed into and remain in, an enclosure designated as a selling pen.

(3) All bulls and project calves shall be inspected and identified by a Brand Inspector.

(4) When bulls or project calves are sold, the seller shall furnish the purchaser with a fully completed Bill of Sale or Consignment, including identification numbers for all bulls or project calves.

(5) The seller shall mail a duplicate copy of the Bill of Sale or Consignment to the Brand Inspector with a stamped envelope bearing the purchaser’s complete name and address.

(6) The Brand Inspector shall then issue a Brand Inspection Certificate and mail it to the purchaser.

(7) Brand inspection fees shall be paid on each certificate issued. The Brand Inspector shall collect fees for the certificates as they are issued.

(8) The Brand Inspector shall be contacted and a Brand Inspection Certificate issued before the animal leaves the seller’s premises for any bull or project calf that is sold and is to be transported out of the state.

(9) Each Memorandum of Understanding shall expire one year from the date that the completed document is dated.

(c) There shall be signature blocks for the producer or breeder, the Brand Inspector, and the Regional Brand Inspector, and dates for when the signatures are made. There shall also be a date for the document.

(d) This memorandum of understanding may be discontinued by the Chief of the Bureau of Livestock Identification upon a finding by the chief that any provision is not being met, or at any time that the chief determines that further action is necessary in order to satisfy brand inspection requirements and the integrity of the program set forth in Chapter 6 and Chapter 7 of Division 10.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 568, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Records and Memorandums [21321. - 21323.]

21321.

The inspector shall make a memorandum which shows the number, sex, brands, or marks on each animal which is inspected, and the names of the owner or claimant, consignor, and consignee.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

21322.

The memorandum of the inspection shall be retained for record purposes by the inspector for at least two years after the date of the inspection.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

21323.

The bureau shall maintain for a period of five years a file of brand inspection certificates in such manner as to disclose the number of cattle which have been inspected.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 7. Inspection of Hides and Carcasses [21451. - 21591.]



  ARTICLE 1. Requirements [21451. - 21459.]

21451.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, inspection of carcasses with the hide on and of hides shall be made in the same manner as inspection of cattle pursuant to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 21051) of this division.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

21452.

The chief may provide for the release of hides or carcasses from inspection in cases in which inspection would serve no useful purpose.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

21453.

A new inspection need not be made of the hide or carcass of an animal which was previously inspected as follows:

(a) Inspected pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 21051.

(b) Inspected pursuant to subdivisions (d), (f) and (g) of Section 21051 and slaughtered in accordance with Section 21057.

(c) Inspected pursuant to Section 22004 and subdivision (c) of Section 22008.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 385.)
-------------------------------------------

21455.

Every person not a licensed slaughterer that slaughters any cattle or calves and does not send the carcass and hide to a licensed frozen food locker plant pursuant to Section 22003 shall do all of the following:

(a) Keep in his possession the hide, with the brands attached to it, without any alteration or disfiguration, until the hide is inspected or released.

(b) Exhibit the hide to any inspector or peace officer on demand.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 938.)
-------------------------------------------

21456.

A person shall not have in his possession a carcass or any meat from a carcass which was not slaughtered by a licensed slaughterer, unless he has in his possession and exhibits to any inspector or peace officer on demand one of the following:

(a) The hide of the animal from which the meat was obtained, with the ears and the brands attached to it, without alteration or disfiguration.

(b) A certificate of inspection or release of the hide or of the carcass with the hide on it, which was issued pursuant to this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 938.)
-------------------------------------------

21457.

A person shall not remove any evidence of inspection from a hide until after it has been partially tanned.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

21458.

A person shall not sell, give away, deliver, transport, buy, accept, or receive the hide of any animal unless the hide has been inspected or released.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

21459.

A person shall not obliterate, alter, or remove a brand which is on a hide, or burn or in any manner destroy the hide until it has been inspected or released.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Procedure [21482. - 21482.]

21482.

If, upon inspection, there is found any carcass or hide which does not bear the recorded brand of the person that presents the carcass or hide for inspection, such person shall show the inspector a bill of sale, certificate of inspection, or other proof of ownership of such carcass or hide.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Duplicate Brand Inspection Certificates [21531. - 21532.]

21531.

Unless the shipment is exempted under Section 21453 or released pursuant to Section 21532, no common carrier, or owner or driver of any conveyance shall receive for transportation or transport any hide or carcass until it has been inspected and the carrier, owner, or driver has been furnished with a duplicate brand inspection certificate that is signed by an inspector, which shows all of the following:

(a) Any brand and mark.

(b) The name of the shipper and consignee.

(c) The origin and destination of the shipment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 938.)
-------------------------------------------

21532.

The chief may release, or provide for the release of, any carcass or hide without the inspection which is required by Section 21531. Inspection shall, however, be made en route or at point of destination.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Fees [21561. - 21565.]

21561.

All brand inspection fees are due and payable at the time of the inspection. The amount which is due for all inspections that are made shall be paid to the inspector within 30 days after the issuance of the brand inspection certificates for the hides or carcasses which were inspected unless there is on deposit with the bureau a bond in an amount and form which is approved by the chief or a cash deposit to cover the payment of those fees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 361, Sec. 15.   Effective August 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

21562.

Any fees which are due and payable for brand inspections that are made which remain unpaid or are not paid as required by this article may be recovered by the director pursuant to Section 281. Inspection services may be refused for nonpayment of prior services which have been rendered.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

21563.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, the fee shall be paid at the point of inspection and is two dollars and ten cents ($2.10) for each carcass or hide that is inspected.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 214, Sec. 7.   (AB 2436)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21563.5.

The fee for the inspection of each carcass or hide shall be two dollars and ten cents ($2.10) for each carcass and hide originating in those counties or geographical areas where a point-of-origin inspection is maintained pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 21141) of Chapter 6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 214, Sec. 8.   (AB 2436)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21565.

A charge shall not be made for the inspection of any hide which has been previously inspected pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Reports [21591. - 21591.]

21591.

The bureau shall maintain for a period of five years a file of brand inspection certificates in such manner as to disclose the number of carcasses or hides which have been inspected.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 8. Sale and Gift of Cattle, Their Carcasses and Hides [21701. - 21751.]



  ARTICLE 1. Bills of Sale [21701. - 21710.]

21701.

As used in this article, “animal” includes:

(a) A bovine animal.

(b) The carcass of a bovine animal from which the hide has not been removed. 

(c) The hide of a bovine animal.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

21702.

No person shall buy, sell, or accept any animal, unless the seller or donor gives, and the buyer or donee receives, at the time of the delivery of the animal, a written bill of sale or written instrument from the owner, or his or her agent, that gives the number, kind, breed, and sex, and, if branded, the brand and location of the brand on each animal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 653, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

21702.1.

Any person who sells or otherwise transfers title to any cattle or calves to another person shall remit to the director within 30 days of that sale, the beef council fees required under Section 64691, together with a copy of the bill of sale, unless these fees have been collected pursuant to a brand inspection as provided for in Section 64691.7.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 12, Sec. 1.5.   Effective February 1, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

21703.

Except as provided in Section 21058, bills of sale or consignment required by any provision of Division 9 (commencing with Section 16301) or Division 10 (commencing with Section 20001) shall be made on the “Bill of Sale or Consignment” form approved by the director, and shall state all of the following information for animals sold or consigned:

(a) The date of sale or consignment.

(b) The loading point.

(c) The name and address of the owner or the consignor, or both.

(d) The destination.

(e) The number and description of the animals including their brands, if any. 

(f) The name and address of the buyer or consignee, or both.

(g) The name of the transporter or carrier and the license number of the vehicle used to transport the animals.

(h) The signature of the owner or his authorized agent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1979, Ch. 318.)
-------------------------------------------

21704.

The failure of the seller or donor to give a written bill of sale or written instrument to the buyer or donee has no effect upon the validity of any sale or contract of sale or gift of an animal nor upon the rights of either the buyer, donee, seller, or donor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

21705.

If by any provision of this division a certificate, bill of sale, or other document is required to accompany any shipment of animals, nothing in this division shall be construed to make the carrier, driver, or any person other than the shipper responsible for the accuracy of the information required in the document.

The person transporting is, however, responsible for having the documents required by this division in possession during shipment, and the driver shall deliver such document to the person receiving the cattle at destination so it can be presented to the inspector prior to inspection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 938.)
-------------------------------------------

21706.

Any invoice of sale or bill of sale which has been altered, defaced or changed is void. An inspector may, however, indicate on a bill of sale any number of cattle which are sold by the holder of the bill of sale, if he initials and dates such alterations on the bill of sale.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

21707.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 21706, it is unlawful for any person to alter, deface or change any invoice of sale or bill of sale.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

21708.

An auctioneer shall not offer any milking cow for sale at any auction sale of cattle unless the milking cow has been milked out and stripped within 12 hours of the time such offer to sell the cow takes place.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

21709.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 21706, it is unlawful for any person to possess, or to present to an inspector or peace officer, any invoice of sale or bill of sale that has been altered, defaced, or otherwise changed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 938.)
-------------------------------------------

21710.

It is unlawful for any person to falsify any of the bill of sale information required by Sections 21702 and 21703, or to present such falsified documents to an inspector or peace officer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 938.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Public Salesyards [21731. - 21751.]

21731.

Stockyards which are posted by the United States Department of Agriculture under the Packers and Stockyards Act (7 U.S.C., Sec. 181 et seq.), agricultural fairs, 4-H Clubs, Future Farmers, Junior Farmers, and associations which sponsor purebred cattle sales for their members are exempt from the license provisions of this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

21732.

The license and bond provisions of this article do not apply to the sale by an auctioneer of cattle on the premises of the owner of the cattle whether or not such a sale includes the sale of cattle of other livestock owners in the vicinity of such premises. If, however, an animal which does not belong to the owner of the premises is auctioned, the auctioneer shall specifically designate the person that is the owner of the animal.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

21733.

A person shall not engage in the business of selling cattle at a public salesyard unless he has done all of the following:

(a) Obtained a license from the bureau to carry on such business at each such salesyard.

(b) Executed for each such salesyard a bond to the state in the sum of one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

21734.

The bond required pursuant to Section 21733 is subject to the approval of the director and shall be conditioned as follows:

(a) That the person shall not sell any cattle unless he is the owner of the cattle or is authorized to sell them by the owner.

(b) That, if he does sell any cattle which he does not own without authorization from the owner, he shall, in addition to all other statutory penalties, pay the value of the animals.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

21735.

Any amount which is recovered upon the bond shall be paid to the owner of the animal.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

21736.

The bureau shall grant to every applicant that complies with this article and the regulations which are adopted pursuant to it, a separate license to operate each salesyard for the balance of the current calendar year upon the payment of a fee of one hundred dollars ($100) for each salesyard.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

21737.

A permit shall be granted by the bureau to change the address or location of a previously licensed salesyard. No additional license fee or bond shall be collected for issuing a permit to change the address or location.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

21738.

Each such license shall be renewed on or before the first day of each succeeding calendar year. The renewal fee is one hundred dollars ($100) for each salesyard.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

21743.

Any person that is engaged in the business of selling cattle on consignment at any public stockyard, public salesyard, or public cattle sales market shall prepare a certificate of consignment on or before the day of a sale which contains all of the following:

(a) The name and address of the owner.

(b) The name and address of the consignee.

(c) A description of each animal which shall indicate the sex, the breed and, in the case of branded animals, the brand and brand location.

(d) Signature of the owner or his agent.

The certificate of consignment shall be kept by the seller for a period of one year after the date of sale. Any such certificate shall be exhibited on the demand of any peace officer or any agent of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 504, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

21744.

Cattle shall not be released from a public stockyard, public salesyard, public cattle sales market, or any other public consignment sale or private auction sale unless they are accompanied by a brand inspection certificate or by a press-numbered bill of sale or a press-numbered certificate of sale that is issued and signed by a representative of the salesyard, as agents for the consignor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 651, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

21745.

The press-numbered bill of sale or press-numbered certificate of sale that is required pursuant to Section 21744 shall contain all of the following information on a form that is approved by the chief:

(a) Date of sale.

(b) Name and address of the buyer.

(c) Description of each animal that is sold that includes its brands and brand location, sex, and breed of unbranded animals.

(d) Origin and destination of the animals.

(e) The name of the person conducting the sale.

The press-numbered bill of sale or press-numbered certificate of sale shall be kept by the seller for a period of one year after the date of sale. Any such document shall be exhibited on the demand of any peace officer or any agent of the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 651, Sec. 1.5.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

21746.

The director may make regulations which govern the brand inspection of cattle at public salesyards, public stockyards and at private cattle auction sales. The regulations may provide a schedule of fees to cover the cost of inspection of cattle at such salesyards and stockyards, and private sales. In establishing the fee schedule the director shall take into consideration the brand inspection fees collected. The payment of the fees established by the director shall be the obligation of the operator of the salesyard, stockyard, or private sale and shall not be an added charge to the consignor or seller of the livestock.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1968, Ch. 775.)
-------------------------------------------

21747.

It is unlawful for any person to sell cattle at a public salesyard or release cattle from public salesyards unless an inspector has made a brand inspection of animals which are consigned or shipped to such yard.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 730.)
-------------------------------------------

21748.

It is unlawful for any person to release any cattle which are sold at public auction unless the required brand inspection certificate has been prepared by the inspector in advance of the release of the cattle from the premises where the auction was conducted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1973, Ch. 938.)
-------------------------------------------

21749.

Except as otherwise provided in Section 21750, any person that engages as a business in the sale of cattle at a public salesyard without a license is, in addition to all other penalties, liable to a penalty of twenty-five dollars ($25) and an additional penalty of one dollar ($1) per day for every day he has operated a public salesyard without a license.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

21750.

Any public cattle salesyard operator that has had a previous license and continues to operate a public salesyard after the expiration of his license is not required to pay penalties pursuant to Section 21749 if he applies for a new license within 30 days after the expiration of his license.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

21751.

(a) If cattle sold at a public auction have a dairy exemption number, the auctioneer shall announce at the sale that those cattle are being sold under the dairy exemption number provision and must go directly to slaughter.

(b) Any person who buys cattle under a dairy exemption number at a public auction and fails to send those cattle directly to slaughter is guilty of a public offense punishable by a fine not exceeding one hundred dollars ($100) per incident for the first violation, not exceeding two hundred fifty dollars ($250) per incident for a second violation, and not exceeding five hundred dollars ($500) per incident for a third or subsequent violation. These penalties shall take effect on July 1, 2007. Prior to that date, the department shall notify salesyard managers and dairy producers at salesyards that it is a violation of law to neglect to send cattle covered by this section directly to slaughter, and issue oral or written warnings for noncompliance.

(History: Added by Stats. 2006, Ch. 584, Sec. 1.4.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9. Injury to, or Theft of, Cattle [21851. - 21886.]



  ARTICLE 1. Driving Cattle From Their Range [21851. - 21856.]

21851.

As used in this article, “range” means the enclosed or unenclosed lands outside of cities, towns, and villages in this state, whether of the public domain or in private ownership, upon which by custom, license, or otherwise, cattle are kept or permitted to roam and feed.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

21852.

Any person that is not the owner or does not have the right of possession of any cattle, that is found driving such cattle off its usual range, without the consent of the owner, is guilty of grand theft.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

21855.

Notwithstanding any other law, in any action for the wrongful taking, possessing, harboring, or transporting of cattle, for the driving of cattle off their usual range, or for the killing or slaughter of cattle without the consent of the owner or the person lawfully in possession of such cattle, the detriment caused thereby to the plaintiff shall be four times the value of the cattle at the time of the taking, possessing, harboring, transporting, or driving, or killing or slaughtering thereof, with interest from that time, plus an amount in fair compensation for the time and money properly expended by the plaintiff in pursuit of the cattle.

This section shall not apply to a secured party, as defined in paragraph (73) of
 subdivision (a) of Section 9102 of the Commercial Code, when taking possession of cattle pursuant to a security agreement if one of the following conditions has been met prior to movement of any such cattle:

(a) The secured party has requested and received a brand inspection of the cattle covered by the security agreement pursuant to Sections 21051.5 and 21171 of this code.

(b) The secured party has requested the inspection required by subdivision (a) and due to an insufficient amount of time to inspect the cattle prior to their movement, the brand inspector agrees to allow movement of the cattle, with inspection of the cattle to be made at their first destination prior to their commingling with any other cattle.

The inspection performed pursuant to subdivision (a) or (b) shall be conducted for the sole purpose of assuring that the cattle
 that are moved are the same cattle subject to the security agreement.

In a proper case, which shall include the killing or slaughter of cattle, exemplary damages may be awarded to the plaintiff as provided in Section 3340 of the Civil Code.

The commencement of any criminal prosecution for grand theft of cattle shall not preclude or prevent the commencement of any civil action for damages, as specified in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 531, Sec. 25.   (AB 502)   Effective January 1, 2014.   Operative July 1, 2014, pursuant to Sec. 28 of Ch. 531.)
-------------------------------------------

21856.

(a) The judge before whom any person is tried for the wrongful taking, possessing, killing, or slaughter of cattle without the consent of the owner or the person lawfully in possession of those cattle may, upon the conviction of the person tried, order the forfeiture of any device or apparatus that is designed to be, or is capable of being, used to commit the offense charged, and which was used in committing the offense charged. “Device or apparatus” includes, but is not limited to, any vehicle that is used or intended for use in taking, possessing, harboring, or transporting the cattle.

(b) Any device or apparatus ordered forfeited shall be sold, used, or destroyed by the department.

(c) The provisions in this section authorizing a judge to order the forfeiture of a device or apparatus are also applicable to the judge, referee, or juvenile hearing officer in a juvenile court action brought under Section 258 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(d) For purposes of this section, a plea of nolo contendere or no contest, or forfeiture of bail, constitutes a conviction.

(e) Neither the disposition of the criminal action other than by conviction nor the discretionary refusal of the judge to order forfeiture upon conviction impairs the right of the department to commence proceedings to order the forfeiture of property pursuant to any other provision of law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 149, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Livestock Killed or Injured on Railroads [21881. - 21886.]

21881.

If any animal is killed or injured upon the right-of-way of any railroad in this state, the owner or operator of the railroad equipment injuring or killing the animal shall report it as soon as possible, but in no event later than 96 hours after the collision.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

21882.

The report shall contain all of the following:

(a) A description of the animal.

(b) The brands and marks and the position of the brands and marks, if any, upon the animal.

(c) The location of the animal.

(d) The location of the point of collision, listing the county, the nearest post office, and milepost.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

21883.

The report shall be given by telephone, telegraph, or mail to the owner of the animal if known. If the owner of the animal is unknown, the report shall be given to the office of the sheriff or brand inspector whose office or established headquarters is, to the knowledge of the railroad employee who makes the report, the nearest to the place of the collision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 872, Sec. 30.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

21884.

Reports by telephone shall be confirmed within 24 hours by telegraph or mail to the office of the sheriff. A copy shall be sent to the bureau.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

21885.

Upon receiving the report the officer or brand inspector shall attempt to ascertain the ownership of the dead or injured animal and notify the owner of the death or injury of the animal.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------

21886.

It is unlawful for any person to bury, conceal, or destroy any animal, or do anything to the carcass of any animal, which will tend to make ascertainment of its ownership more difficult until the owner has been notified or the officer or brand inspector has identified the brands and marks, if any, and their position upon the animal.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1967, Ch. 15.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 10. Slaughter of Cattle [22001. - 22086.]



  ARTICLE 1. Generally [22001. - 22010.]

22001.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a person shall not slaughter, or request or hire any person that is not a licensed slaughterer to slaughter, any bovine animal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1986, Ch. 828, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

22001.5.

The Legislature finds and declares that mobile slaughter operators who perform the service of slaughtering cattle for the owner of the cattle on the owner’s premises are not licensed slaughterers pursuant to this chapter. However, on and after January 15, 1998, a mobile slaughter operator shall be registered with the bureau as an unlicensed mobile slaughterer pursuant to Section 22037 and is subject to Section 22008.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 651, Sec. 1.6.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

22002.

Any producer of cattle may slaughter or have slaughtered for him on his own premises, in small numbers, cattle of his own production and raising on his own premises for use exclusively by him, members of his household and his nonpaying guests and employees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1970, Ch. 1385.)
-------------------------------------------

22003.

Cattle which are slaughtered by or for the producer of the cattle at his premises and for his own consumption may be transported with the hide on, after complete removal of the viscera, head, and feet, to any licensed frozen food locker plant to be skinned, split, and quartered by the operator of the plant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1973, Ch. 938.)
-------------------------------------------

22004.
